District of Columbia statutes.
42-1902.03

Description of condominium units; undivided interest in common elements automatically included.

After the creation of the condominium, no description of a condominium unit shall be deemed vague, uncertain, or otherwise insufficient or infirm which sets forth the identifying number of that unit, the name of the condominium and the instrument number and date of recordation of the declaration and the condominium book and page number where the plats and plans are recorded. Any such description shall be deemed to include the undivided interest in the common elements appertaining to such unit even if such interest is not defined or referred to therein.

History

Mar. 29, 1977, D.C. Law 1-89, title II, § 203, 23 DCR 9532b

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-1813.
1973 Ed., § 5-1213.